District of Columbia statutes.
38-755.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Chancellor” means the chief executive officer of the District of Columbia Public Schools appointed pursuant to § 38-174.

(2)

“DCPS” means the District of Columbia Public Schools established by § 38-171.

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 502, 59 DCR 3642